District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Youth Curfew Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Juvenile Curfew Act of 1995, effective September 20, 1995 (D.C. Law 11-48;
D.C. Official Code § 2-1541 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1541) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the number “17” wherever it appears and insert the number “18” in its
place.
(2) Strike the word “juvenile” wherever it appears and insert the word “youth” in
its place.
(3) A new subsection (b-1) is added to read as follows:
“(b-1) The Council has determined that since 2023, the District has seen a rise in
endangering situations involving unaccompanied youth, such as self-described “takeovers”
unsupervised by adults or planned fights, driven by social media. The far-reaching nature of
social media is a novel problem that the Council must address in new ways.”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1542) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) “Chief of Police” means the Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department.”.
(2) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) “Curfew hours” means:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) From 11:00 p.m. on any Sunday, Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, or
Thursday, until 6:00 a.m. on the following day, and from 12:01 a.m. until 6:00 a.m. on any
Saturday or Sunday; except, that during the months of July and August, the term “curfew hours”
means from 12:01 a.m. until 6:00 a.m.; and
“(B) Extended curfew hours in extended youth curfew zones established
by the Mayor or the Chief of Police pursuant to section 3a.”.
(3) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
“(3A) “Extended youth curfew zone” means a geographically defined area in which
extended curfew hours established pursuant to section 3a apply.”.
(4) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “under the age of 17 years” and
inserting the phrase “under the age of 18 years” in its place.
(5) A new paragraph (6A) is added to read as follows:
“(6A) “Notice of violation of curfew” means a verbal warning that informs a
minor or group of minors that they are violating the terms of a curfew and that they may be
arrested if they continue to violate the curfew, and identifies reasonable steps the minor or group
of minors can take to avoid arrest.”.
(6) A new paragraph (12) is added to read as follows:
“(12) “Youth” means any person under the age of 18 years, but does not include a
judicially emancipated minor or a married minor.”.
(c) New sections 3a and 3b are added to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. Temporary extended youth curfew zones.
“(a)(1) By issuance of an order, the Mayor or the Chief of Police may designate any part
of the District as an extended youth curfew zone after determining that such a designation is
appropriate to protect public safety or public or private property. Within the extended youth
curfew zone, the Mayor or the Chief of Police may extend the curfew hours in the District
beyond the hours established in section 3(1A)(A).
“(2) Extended curfew hours established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall not:
“(A) Begin earlier than 8:00 p.m. on any day, or extend past 6:00 a.m. of
the following day;
“(B) Remain in effect for more than 4 consecutive days, except as
provided for in subsection (e) of this section; or
“(C) Apply to groups of 8 or fewer minors.
“(3) In determining whether to designate an extended youth curfew zone, the
Chief of Police shall consider:
“(A) Within the preceding 30 days, the occurrence of the following in the
proposed extended youth curfew zone:
“(i) Youth curfew violations;
“(ii) Police reports involving minors of disturbances of the public
peace as described in section 1 of An Act To confer concurrent jurisdiction on the police court of
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
the District of Columbia in certain cases, approved July 16, 1912 (37 Stat. 192; D.C. Official
Code § 22-1301), sections 6, 3, 9, or 16 of An act for the preservation of the public peace and the
protection of property within the District of Columbia, approved July 29, 1892 (27 Stat. 323;
D.C. Official Code §§ 22-1307, 22-1309, 22-1312, or 22-1318), section 211 of the District of
Columbia Law Enforcement Act of 1953, approved June 29, 1953 (67 Stat. 98; D.C. Official
Code § 22-1321), or section 901 of An Act relating to crime and criminal procedure in the
District of Columbia, approved December 27, 1967 (81 Stat. 742; D.C. Official Code § 22-
1322);
“(iii) Police reports involving minors of dangerous crimes as that
term is defined in D.C. Official Code § 23-1331(3);
“(iv) Police reports involving minors of crimes of violence, as that
term is defined in D.C. Official Code § 23-1331(4); or
“(v) Police reports involving minors of destruction of or damage to
public or private property;
“(B) Intelligence or verifiable information indicative of an intent of 9 or
more minors to gather in the proposed extended youth curfew zone in such a manner that is
likely to result in substantial harm to the public safety, the safety of those gathering, or
substantial damage to public or private property; and
“(C) Any other verifiable information from which the Chief of Police may
ascertain that public safety or public or private property in the proposed extended youth curfew
zone is likely to be endangered by the presence of unaccompanied minors in the extended youth
curfew zone.
“(b) An order issued by the Mayor or the Chief of Police pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section shall:
“(1) State the basis for the designation of the extended youth curfew zone;
“(2) State the boundaries of the extended youth curfew zone; and
“(3) State the days and hours during which the extended youth curfew zone shall
be in effect.
“(c) Except where emergency circumstances, as determined by the Mayor or the Chief of
Police and described in the order issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, warrant
otherwise, extended youth curfew zones imposed under this section shall not take effect until at
least 24 hours after the posting of the order pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
“(d) Notice of an order issued under this section shall be promptly posted on the main
website of the District government and on the website of the Metropolitan Police Department. The
Mayor or the Chief of Police shall ensure that conspicuous signs are posted in the immediate area
of an extended youth curfew zone. Any digital notice shall include:
“(1) A plain-language description of lawful activities that remain permitted for
minors in the extended youth curfew zone; and
“(2) The locations, days, times, and transportation options for alternative youth
events required pursuant to section 3b.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(e) The Mayor or the Chief of Police may extend the time period during which an
extended youth curfew zone imposed by this section shall remain in effect by issuing subsequent
orders extending the time period; provided, that each such extension of the time period shall not
exceed 30 days.
“(f) If members of the Metropolitan Police Department discover minors in an extended
youth curfew zone during the hours the extended curfew is in effect, the Metropolitan Police
Department shall:
“(1) Where there:
“(A) Is not an imminent danger of bodily injury or significant damage to
property, issue at least 2 clearly audible and understandable notices of violation of curfew prior
to arrest of any minor for violation of the curfew; or
“(B) Is imminent danger of bodily injury or significant damage to
property, issue at least one clearly audible and understandable notice of violation of curfew prior
to arrest of any minor for violation of the curfew;
“(2) Provide minors with a reasonable and adequate time to disperse; and
“(3) Capture on body-worn camera each component of the notice described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
“(g)(1) An Advisory Neighborhood Commission (“ANC”) may petition the Chief of
Police to establish an extended youth curfew zone in an area within the bounds or jurisdiction of,
or adjacent to the area within the bounds or jurisdiction of, the ANC. Such petition shall be
approved by a formal vote of the members of the ANC.
“(2) A petition submitted pursuant to this subsection shall include the following
information:
“(A) The proposed boundaries of the extended youth curfew zone;
“(B) The proposed hours of the extended youth curfew zone;
“(C) The proposed duration, in days, of the extended youth curfew zone;
“(D) The reasons why the ANC is requesting the designation of an
extended youth curfew zone; and
“(E) Such other information as the Chief of Police may require.
“(3) Consideration of a petition submitted under this section and the
determination of whether to designate an extended youth curfew zone in response to the petition
shall be at the sole discretion of the Chief of Police.
“(h) For purposes of enforcing a violation of curfew under this section, a police officer
shall not stop, question, disperse, or transport a minor based solely on:
“(1) Presence in a designated extended youth curfew zone prior to the beginning
of curfew hours;
“(2) Presence in a group smaller than the threshold set forth in section
3a(a)(2)(C); or
“(3) Any other factor that, standing alone, does not constitute a violation of
curfew under this act or any other law.
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i) Notwithstanding subsection (h) of this section, the Metropolitan Police Department
may issue verbal warnings of the start of curfew hours to minors beginning not more than 30
minutes before the start of curfew hours.
“Sec. 3b. Positive youth programming during extended youth curfew zones.
“(a) The Department of Parks and Recreation (“DPR”) or a community-based
organization designated by the Mayor, which may be supported with grant funds provided by the
District, shall host at least one evening event for minors for each period that an extended youth
curfew zone is in effect.
“(b) At the time of issuing an order to establish an extended youth curfew zone, the
Mayor or the Chief of Police shall publicly announce the locations, days, and times of the
concurrent events required under subsection (a) of this section.
“(c) The Mayor or the Chief of Police shall coordinate with the Washington Metropolitan
Area Transit Authority and District agencies, including DPR and the Office of Neighborhood
Safety and Engagement, to support safe access for minors to and from events held pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, including through outreach to minors and on-the-ground presence.
“(d) DPR or the designated community-based organization shall make good faith efforts
to incorporate input from youth in the planning and implementation of events required under
subsection (a) of this section, including input on the location, hours, and types of activities
offered. To meet this requirement, DPR or the designated community-based organization may:
“(1) Conduct listening sessions, focus groups, or surveys with youth;
“(2) Partner with youth-serving community-based organizations; or
“(3) Establish short-term, compensated opportunities for youth to provide input
on event design and programming.
“(e) Notwithstanding section 4(a)(1), a minor shall not be deemed in violation of curfew
hours while traveling directly to or from an event held pursuant to subsection (a) of this section;
provided, that the minor does not engage in any detour or stop unrelated to such activity.”.
(d) Section 4(c) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1543(c)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “the nearest available Police
District headquarters or substation or other area designated by the Metropolitan Police
Department” and inserting the phrase “a designated place by the Metropolitan Police
Department; provided, that the designated place is not a police district station or a juvenile
detention center” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
“(3) A minor who violates this act and is subsequently detained by the
Metropolitan Police Department shall be released within a reasonable time into the custody of
the minor’s parent, guardian, or an adult person acting in loco parentis. If such person is not
immediately available, the minor may be transported to:
“(A) The minor’s residence;
“(B) Any youth programming event established under section 3b;
“(C) A 24-hour youth drop-in center;
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(D) Another safe location identified by the minor; or
“(E) If none of the above options are viable, the custody of the appropriate
official at the Child and Family Services Agency.”.
Sec. 3. Sunset.
This act shall expire on December 31, 2028.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
(a) Amendatory section 3b within section 2(c) and section 2(d) shall apply upon the date
of inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provisions identified in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
7